Louisiana, session 2026, HB625.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1300.9(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1300.9. Insurable interest
* * *
D.(1) If a peer-to-peer car sharing program does not provide a non-insurance
contractual physical damage protection package, consistent with R.S. 22:1300.10(4),
to the shared vehicle during the car sharing period, the program shall own and
maintain as the named insured a policy of insurance written by an insurer admitted
or approved in this state, covering physical damage for collision and comprehensive
losses to the shared vehicle during the car sharing period.
(2) The policy of insurance required by this Subsection applies when the
policy of insurance maintained by the shared vehicle owner excludes or otherwise
does not provide coverage for physical damage for collision and comprehensive
losses to the shared vehicle during the car sharing period.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-788 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 625
(3) The policy of insurance required by this Subsection may include a
deductible in an amount no greater than one thousand dollars per occurrence.
(4) The policy of insurance required by this Subsection may include
subrogation rights against a tortfeasor.